Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.095

Transfer of membership from judicial retirement system.

(1) Any member of the Washington judicial retirement system who wishes to transfer such membership to the retirement system provided for in this chapter shall file a written request with the director as required by RCW 2.10.040 on or before December 31, 1989, or within one year after reentering service as a judge.

Upon receipt of such request, the director shall transfer from the judicial retirement system to this retirement system: (a) An amount equal to the employee and employer contributions the judge would have made if the judge's service under chapter 2.10 RCW had originally been earned under this chapter, which employee contributions shall be credited to the member's account established under this chapter; and (b) a record of service credited to the member. The judge's accumulated contributions that exceed the amount credited to the judge's account under this subsection shall be deposited in the judge's retirement account created pursuant to chapter 2.14 RCW.

(2) The member shall be given year-for-year credit for years of service, as determined under *RCW 2.10.030(8), earned under the judicial retirement system. Service credit granted under the judicial retirement system pursuant to RCW 2.10.220 shall not be transferred under this section. The director instead shall reverse the transfer of contributions and service credit previously made under RCW 2.10.220 and shall credit the member for such periods of service and contributions under this chapter as though no transfer had ever occurred.

(3) All employee contributions transferred pursuant to this section shall be treated the same as other employee contributions made under this chapter.

[ 1988 c 109 s 5. Formerly RCW 41.40.540.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 2.10.030 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (8) to subsection (11).

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.